Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2735.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 23, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 23-111, to read: START_STATUTE23-111. Industrial commission of Arizona; department of economic security public assistance; list of employees who receive public assistance; employer list; public posting A. On or before January 1, 2027 and each year thereafter, The Industrial Commission of Arizona and the department of economic security shall publish on the industrial commission's and the department of economic security's publicly accessible websites a list of the top fifty employers in this state with the highest number of employees who receive Medicaid or other public assistance.  The report must include: 1. The name and address of the employer. 2. The size of the employer. 3. The number of public assistance program beneficiaries who are an employee of that employer and the type of assistance each employee receives. 4. The number of public assistance beneficiaries who are a spouse or dependent of an employee of the employer and the type of assistance each spouse or dependent receives. 5. If available, the public welfare program costs to this state for employed individuals and enrolled dependents. 6. If an employer offers health benefits to the employer's employees, the number of employees who receive public assistance. B. The list may not include confidential information that includes the names of the individuals or beneficiaries who receive public assistance. C. The department of economic security shall compile and send all data that is related to subsection A of this section to the industrial commission of Arizona. END_STATUTE